Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska59-1511
Sale of cigarettes; admissible evidence.

(1) In determining cost to the retailer and cost to the wholesaler the division or a court shall receive and consider as bearing on the good faith of such cost, evidence tending to show that any person complained against under any of the provisions of sections 59-1501 to 59-1518 purchased cigarettes, with respect to the sale of which complaint is made, at a fictitious price, or upon terms, or in such a manner, or under such invoices, as to conceal the true cost, discounts or terms of purchase, and shall also receive and consider as bearing on the good faith of such cost, evidence of the normal, customary and prevailing terms and discounts in connection with other sales of a similar nature in the trade area or state.

(2) Merchandise given free or payment made to a retailer or wholesaler by the manufacturer thereof for display, or advertising, or promotion purposes, or otherwise, shall not be considered in determining the cost of cigarettes to the retailer or wholesaler.

Laws 1965, c. 364, § 11, p. 1191.